New York, session 2025-2026, A1593.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 303-a of the social services law is REPEALED and a 2 new section 131-y is added to read as follows: 3 § 131-y. Assistance for guide dogs, hearing dogs and service dogs. 1. 4 It shall be the duty of the social services official to provide assist- 5 ance, in accordance with regulations of the department, to a person with 6 a disability using a guide dog, hearing dog or service dog who has been 7 determined to be eligible for or is receiving, including but not limited 8 to, federal supplemental security income benefits, supplemental nutri- 9 tion assistance program benefits, medical assistance for needy persons 10 and/or additional state payments under this chapter, for the purchase of 11 food and the cost of veterinarian expenses for such dog. 12 2. Such regulations of the department shall fix an amount of not less 13 than fifty dollars a month, and the method and frequency of distribution 14 and procedures for the determination and periodical redetermination of 15 eligibility for such assistance. 16 3. Such assistance shall not be granted to any person for whom earned 17 income has been exempted for such purpose pursuant to federal law or 18 regulation. 19 4. The full amount properly expended by social services districts 20 under this section, including costs of administration, shall be reim- 21 bursed by the state. 22 5. For purposes of this section, "service dog" shall mean any dog, 23 regardless of certification, under the control of the person using or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04670-01-5 A. 1593 2 1 training it and that has been or is being individually trained to do 2 work or perform tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law.